Vermont, session 2025-2026, H767.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Findings and Purpose * * *
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 59 and 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181
have imposed regulatory burdens that may increase housing costs and limit
development opportunities, infringing on private property rights by overriding
individual landowner’s decisions and local control.
(2) The Global Warming Solutions Act establishes emissions reduction
targets that could lead to higher energy costs through mandated transitions to
VT LEG #386330 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.767
2026 Page 2 of 12
cleaner energy sources, restricting individual rights to choose affordable
energy options and violating private property rights through enforced
compliance.
(3) The Renewable Energy Standard established in 30 V.S.A. chapter 89
requires utilities to procure increasing percentages of electricity from
renewable sources, aiming for 100 percent by 2030 or 2035 depending on the
utility, which may result in higher electricity rates and program costs for
ratepayers, burdening individuals and property owners with unnecessary
expenses.
(4) The Clean Heat Standard aims to reduce greenhouse gas emissions
from heating fuels but may result in increased costs for heating and energy for
households with low and moderate income, limiting personal freedoms in
energy consumption.
(5) These acts, while intended to promote environmental sustainability,
may inadvertently exacerbate affordability challenges in housing and energy,
particularly in rural areas of Vermont, and encroach on fundamental individual
rights to economic self-determination and private property use.
(6) A temporary moratorium is necessary to evaluate the cumulative
impacts on housing availability, energy affordability, and overall costs to
Vermonters, allowing time for alternative approaches that balance
VT LEG #386330 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.767
2026 Page 3 of 12
environmental goals with economic realities, while safeguarding private
property rights against regulatory overreach.
(7) On September 17, 2025, Governor Phil Scott issued Executive Order
06-25, which promotes housing construction and rehabilitation by directing
State agencies to streamline permitting processes, reduce or defer fees for
multifamily housing, adjust building energy standards such as the Residential
Building Energy Standards (RBES) and Commercial Building Energy
Standards (CBES) to mitigate cost impacts, identify and resolve regulatory
barriers, and provide monthly performance reports on permit processing times
and housing project approvals. This order addresses housing affordability by
aiming to lower development costs and accelerate the production of needed
housing units, with Vermont requiring approximately 40,000 new homes by
2030, particularly for renters who often spend over 50 percent of their income
on housing. However, the Executive Order’s focus on administrative reforms
does not fully mitigate the statutory burdens imposed by the targeted acts,
necessitating this legislative moratorium to pause additional cost drivers and
allow for a comprehensive evaluation of combined impacts, including
protections for individual and property rights.
(8) Scientific evidence from the CO2 Coalition indicates that higher
CO2 levels, such as doubling to 800 ppm, would boost plant growth by 40–46
percent, enhancing Vermont’s agricultural output, such as dairy and maple, and
VT LEG #386330 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.767
2026 Page 4 of 12
drought resistance, countering mandates that treat CO2 solely as a pollutant
and infringe on individual rights to benefit from natural processes.
(9) Physicist William Happer’s analyses show CO2 is essential for life,
with benefits like improved crop efficiency and minimal warming (1°C per
doubling), outweighing costs in rural economies like Vermont’s, and saturation
physics demonstrates no dangerous warming from greenhouse gases,
supporting the protection of individual rights against unfounded regulatory
restrictions.
(10) Energy analyses by Peter Clack reveal decarbonization adds
billions in costs, such as $275 trillion globally by 2050 for net zero
infrastructure, without acknowledging CO2’s role in affordable energy and
ecosystem health, emphasizing the need to protect private property from
excessive financial burdens.
(11) Electroverse data confirms CO2-driven greening, with 55.15
percent accelerated global greening from 2001–2020 and global vegetation up
15 percent since the 1980s due to CO2, supporting Vermont’s forests and
reducing net emissions through natural sequestration, thus benefiting
individual property owners in agriculture and forestry.
(12) Data from the 2022 Hunga Tonga eruption shows it injected 150 Tg
of water vapor, causing stratospheric cooling (-4K) and minor surface cooling,
persisting into 2025, indicating natural events like volcanic activity can explain
VT LEG #386330 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.767
2026 Page 5 of 12
recent anomalies more than CO2, per 2024–2025 studies, justifying a pause on
mandates that overlook such factors while infringing on private property
through enforced transitions.
(13) Glacial ice core research, including Vostok, EPICA, demonstrates
CO2 lagged temperature by 800–1,000 years in historical cycles, with lower
glacial CO2 (190–250 ppm) acting as a feedback, not driver, supporting that
CO2 is beneficial for greening and agriculture, and regulations treating it as a
pollutant unduly restrict private property rights in land and energy use, with
recent 2025 studies showing CO2 lag during glacial cooling initiation, such as
13,000 years in Eemian.
(14) These scientific insights, combined with CO2’s role in boosting
plant growth by 40–50 percent per doubling; drought resistance; and global
greening, including a 14 percent vegetated area increase since 1980, highlight
that environmental mandates may exacerbate costs without proportional
benefits, while eroding private property rights and individual freedoms
essential for Vermont’s economic vitality, such as developing land for housing
amid a 24,000–36,000 unit shortage by 2029.
(15) Research by Bjørn Lomborg demonstrates that the total cost of
untreated climate change is moderate, equivalent to a 3.6 percent reduction in
global gross domestic product across the century, far less than the trillions in
costs from aggressive policies like the Paris Agreement, which could cost
VT LEG #386330 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.767
2026 Page 6 of 12
$819–$1,890 billion annually by 2030 while delivering only $0.11 in climate
benefits per dollar spent, underscoring the inefficiency of such regulations and
fees that burden private property owners and individual rights.
(16) Lomborg’s analyses show that optimal, realistic climate policies,
such as modest carbon taxes, could reduce global temperature rise from 4.1°C
to 3.75°C by 2100 at a cost of $18 trillion, with benefits twice the costs, while
pursuing unrealistic targets like 2°C would leave the world over $250 trillion
worse off, supporting a moratorium on costly Vermont regulations to avoid
undue economic harm and protect individual freedoms in energy choices.
(17) Lomborg advocates for investing in research and development for
cheaper green energy alternatives rather than subsidies and mandates that drive
up energy prices, as current climate policies have spent trillions, including
$4 trillion globally, without making renewables competitive, emphasizing
smarter approaches that respect private property rights and reduce fees on
Vermonters.
(b) The purpose of this act is to impose an eight-year moratorium on the
implementation and enforcement of 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 59, 2024 Acts
and Resolves No. 181, the Global Warming Solutions Act, the Renewable
Energy Standard, and the Clean Heat Standard to provide relief on
affordability issues, protect private property rights and individual rights, and to
study potential reforms based on the latest scientific data.
VT LEG #386330 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.767
2026 Page 7 of 12
* * * Act 59 * * *
Sec. 2. MORATORIUM
Effective upon passage, an eight-year moratorium is imposed on the
implementation, enforcement, and any new regulations under 2023 Acts and
Resolves No. 59. During this period, no new land use restrictions or planning
requirements under this act shall be applied to housing development projects
aimed at increasing affordable housing stock, preserving private property
rights.
* * * Act 181 * * *
Sec. 3. MORATORIUM
Effective upon passage, an eight-year moratorium is imposed on the
implementation, enforcement, and any new regulations under 2024 Acts and
Resolves No. 181, including the development or revision of future land use
maps and operations of the Land Use Review Board as they pertain to housing
and development. This moratorium shall prioritize maintaining private
property rights and individual rights by suspending State-imposed reviews that
override owner decisions and local control over land use.
* * * Global Warming Solutions Act * * *
Sec. 4. MORATORIUM
Effective upon passage, an eight-year moratorium is imposed on new
mandates, emissions reduction requirements, or enforcement actions under the
VT LEG #386330 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.767
2026 Page 8 of 12
Global Warming Solutions Act (10 V.S.A. chapter 24) that directly impact
housing costs or energy affordability. Existing programs may continue, but no
expansions or new compliance costs shall be imposed on residential or
commercial sectors during this period, protecting individual rights to
affordable energy.
* * * Renewable Energy Standard * * *
Sec. 5. MORATORIUM
Effective upon passage, an eight-year moratorium is imposed on new
mandates, increases in renewable procurement targets, or enforcement actions
under the Renewable Energy Standard (30 V.S.A. chapter 89) that would
impose additional costs on ratepayers. No expansions, new tier requirements,
or additional compliance costs shall be imposed on utilities or passed on to
consumers during this period, safeguarding private property from economic
burdens.
* * * Clean Heat Standard * * *
Sec. 6. MORATORIUM
Effective upon passage, an eight-year moratorium is imposed on the
implementation, enforcement, and any new regulations under the Clean Heat
Standard. This includes pausing any carbon credit systems, fuel surcharges, or
transition requirements that could increase heating costs for Vermonters,
respecting individual rights in energy choices.
VT LEG #386330 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.767
2026 Page 9 of 12
* * * Study * * *
Sec. 7. STUDY AND REPORT
(a) The Agency of Natural Resources, in consultation with the Department
of Housing and Community Development and the Public Utility Commission,
shall conduct a comprehensive study on the impacts of the moratoria under this
act.
(b) The study shall include:
(1) an analysis of effects on housing availability, energy costs, and
overall affordability;
(2) recommendations for alternative policies that achieve environmental
goals without undue economic burden or infringement on private property
rights and individual rights;
(3) consideration of competition with other bills, such as S.127,
regarding land use and energy reforms;
(4) an evaluation of the implementation and effects of the Governor’s
Executive Order 06-25 on housing construction, rehabilitation, and
affordability, including how it interacts with the moratoria proposed in this act;
(5) a specific assessment of the Renewable Energy Standard’s impacts
on electricity rates, ratepayer costs, and energy affordability, including
potential alternatives for renewable procurement;
VT LEG #386330 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.767
2026 Page 10 of 12
(6) an evaluation of CO2’s beneficial effects on plant growth, greening,
and agriculture, using data from the CO2 Coalition, Happer, Clack analyses,
and Electroverse to assess if reduction targets overlook economic gains and
violate individual rights;
(7) an assessment of natural climate influences, including the Hunga
Tonga eruption’s cooling effects and ice core evidence of CO2-temperature
lags, using data from recent studies, the CO2 Coalition, Happer, Clack
analyses, and Electroverse to evaluate if mandates infringe on private property
rights without scientific justification;
(8) an analysis of how paused regulations protect private property rights
and individual rights, quantifying economic gains, such as reduced
development costs by four to six percent per the 2025 Vermont Economic
Action Plan, from restored owner autonomy; and
(9) a review of Bjorn Lomborg’s cost-benefit research on climate
policies, including the moderate costs of untreated climate change, including a
3.6 percent gross domestic product reduction, versus the inefficiency of
regulations like the Paris Agreement, such as a $0.11 benefit per dollar, to
recommend cost-effective alternatives that minimize fees and respect private
property rights.
(c) A report shall be submitted to the General Assembly on or before
January 15, 2034.
VT LEG #386330 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.767
2026 Page 11 of 12
Sec. 8. FISCAL IMPACT ANALYSIS
(a) The Joint Fiscal Office, in consultation with the Public Utility
Commission and relevant agencies, has analyzed the potential fiscal impacts of
this act based on available data and estimates.
(b) Estimated savings.
(1) Moratorium on the Clean Heat Standard. Avoidance of up to $956
million in program-related costs, with fuel surcharges estimated at $0.08 per
gallon in the first year, 2026, and increasing to $0.58 per gallon thereafter.
(2) Moratorium on the Global Warming Solutions Act. Potential
reduction in State and resident expenditures for emissions reduction programs,
though specific costs since 2011 are not fully quantified; however, related
climate action plans identify billions of dollars in implementation costs by
2050, with avoided climate damage costs estimated at $6 billion if targets are
met.
(3) Moratorium on the Renewable Energy Standard. Avoidance of
escalating program costs, which have risen from approximately $5 million in
2017 to about $32 million recently, with potential rate increases of five percent
annually leading to over 25 percent by 2030 for retail electricity; changes
could add $150 million to $450 million in ratepayer costs between 2025 and
2035.
VT LEG #386330 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.767
2026 Page 12 of 12
(4) Moratorium on 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 59. Minimal direct
savings but potential preservation of property tax revenues by pausing land
conservation efforts that could remove land from tax rolls or shift burdens,
with impacts varying by town and including possible lower tax bills in areas
with more conserved lands, while protecting private property rights.
(5) Moratorium on 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181. Limited fiscal
impact, primarily savings in administrative costs for the Land Use Review
Board and related planning, with application fees such as $295.00 for Tier 1A
areas and overall fee collections for similar programs historically in the range
of hundreds of thousands annually. The gains here are in preserved private
property rights.
(c) Estimated costs. The comprehensive study required under Sec. 7 of this
act is projected to cost approximately $200,000.00, covering agency
consultations, data analysis, and reporting.
(d) Overall, this act is anticipated to result in net positive fiscal impacts
through significant cost avoidance, outweighing the minor expenses of the
study, while providing economic relief to Vermonters and upholding private
property rights and individual rights.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386330 v.3